Maine, session 132, LD422.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §3112 is enacted to read:
§3112. Placement of noncitizens by the State
1. Noncitizen; defined. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates,
"noncitizen" has the same meaning as in Title 22, section 4099-I, subsection 1, paragraph
E.
2. Placement of noncitizens by the State. The State may not place a noncitizen within
a municipality without prior authorization from the municipality. A municipality may
designate the number of noncitizens the State is allowed to place within that municipality,
and the State may not exceed the number of noncitizens designated by the municipality.